Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.400

Horse and cattle identification—Inspection when consigned for sale.

Horses and cattle may be identified by individual identification certificates or other means of identification authorized by the director. The certificates or other means of identification are valid only for the use of the owner in whose name it is issued.

Horses and cattle identified pursuant to this section are only subject to inspection when the animal is consigned for sale.

[ 2003 c 326 s 44; 1994 c 46 s 20; 1993 c 354 s 9; 1981 c 296 s 23; 1974 ex.s. c 38 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Prior legislative approval—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 16.65.030.

Severability—1981 c 296: See note following RCW 15.08.010.